Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-273
Voting agreements.

(MBCA 7.31) (a) Two or more shareholders
may provide for the manner in which they will vote their shares by signing
an agreement for that purpose. A voting agreement created under this section
is not subject to the provisions of section 21-272.

(b) A voting agreement created
under this section is specifically enforceable.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 73.